Washington statutes.
RCW 15.48.270

Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Seed bailment contract" means any bailment contract for the increase of agricultural seeds where the bailor retains title to seed, seed stock, plant life and the seed crop resulting therefrom.

(2) "Bailee" is any tenant farmer or landowner or both, who, for an agreed compensation agrees to plant agricultural seeds furnished by the bailor and to care for, cultivate, harvest and deliver to the bailor the seed resulting therefrom.

(3) "Bailor" is any seed contractor who delivers agricultural seed to a bailee under the terms of a seed bailment contract which requires the bailee to plant, care for, cultivate, harvest and deliver the resultant seed crop to the bailor and requires the bailor to pay the bailee the amount of compensation agreed upon in the contract for the bailees' services in producing the seed.

[ 1967 c 114 s 14.]

NOTES:

Emergency—Effective date—1967 c 114: See note following RCW 62A.4-406.